test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-silba_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:
# Sopii mallisanaksi 2-tavuisille â-loppuisille sanoille, joiden rakenne on (C) (C) V C1 C2 V

  Noun - silbâ: # â-stems
    silbâ+N+Sg+Nom: silbâ
    silbâ+N+Sg+Gen: siilbâ
    silbâ+N+Sg+Acc: siilbâ
    silbâ+N+Sg+Ill: siilbân
    silbâ+N+Sg+Loc: siilbâst
    silbâ+N+Sg+Com: silbáin
    silbâ+N+Sg+Abe: silbâttáá
    silbâ+N+Ess: silbân
    silbâ+N+Par: silbâd
    silbâ+N+Pl+Nom: siilbah
    silbâ+N+Pl+Gen: siilbâi
    silbâ+N+Pl+Acc: siilbâid
    silbâ+N+Pl+Ill: silbáid
    silbâ+N+Pl+Loc: siilbâin
    silbâ+N+Pl+Com: silbâiguin
    silbâ+N+Pl+Abe: silbâittáá
